Massachusetts, session 194th, H4620.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 7 of the Massachusetts General Laws is hereby amended by placing after Section 
38P the following: -  
SECTION 38Q. (a) Any contract issued for services in the Commonwealth of 
Massachusetts or any political subdivision there-in that receives appropriated funds from the 
legislature of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts shall employ up to 10% of individuals with 
disabilities hired within such contract.  Companies/bidders awarded such contracts must employ 
a minimum of 75 full-time equivalents. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the 
contract, the Supplier Diversity Office in consultation with the Massachusetts Office on 
Disability, the Massachusetts Commission for the Blind and the Massachusetts Rehabilitation 
Commission shall implement and regulate said law.  In addition, said agencies will arrange for 
employment support services for all individuals with disabilities hired through a vast array of 
non- profit employment providers located throughout the Commonwealth.  

of 3 13  (b) Such services shall include but not be limited to janitorial and custodial services, 
landscaping services, mailroom services, food services, fleet management, manufacturing, trash 
removal, document destruction, electronic scanning of documents, and facility management 
services including but not limited to HVAC Services, Painting, Emergency Repair Series, and 
Snow Removal.  
(c) For the purpose of this act, an individual with a disability will be defined as: someone 
(i) who has a severe physical or mental impairment which seriously limits one or more functional 
capacities (such as mobility, communication, self-care, self-direction, interpersonal skills, work 
tolerance, or work skills) in terms of an employment outcome; (ii) someone whose vocational 
rehabilitation can be expected to require multiple vocational rehabilitation services over an 
extended period of time; (iii) someone  who has one or more physical or mental disabilities 
resulting from amputation, arthritis, autism, blindness, burn injury, cancer, cerebral palsy, cystic 
fibrosis, deafness, head injury, heart disease, hemiplegia, hemophilia, respiratory or pulmonary 
dysfunction, mental retardation, mental illness, multiple sclerosis, muscular dystrophy, musculo-
skeletal disorders, neurological disorders (including stroke and epilepsy), paraplegia, 
quadriplegia, and other spinal cord conditions, sickle cell anemia, specific learning disability, 
end-stage renal disease, or another disability or combination of disabilities determined on the 
basis of an assessment for determining eligibility and vocational rehabilitation to cause 
comparable substantial functional limitation.  
(d) The percentage requirements shall be met within one year of award of such contract, 
and steps shall be taken to minimize the displacement of any workers already providing the 
services covered by such contract.  

of 3 35